es: Tipo de accesorio del casco: Bolsa; Hebilla; Soporte para cámara; Almohadilla para la mejilla; Correa para la barbilla; Funda; Almohadilla para la oreja; Portacascos; Limpiador de cascos; Lente; Luz; Forro; Soporte; Protector de nariz; Juego de almohadillas; Kit de tornillos; Pegatina; Correa; Protector solar; Lámina protectora desprendible; Tapón de ventilación; Visera; Cortavientos; Otro
zh-CN: 头盔配件类型: 收纳袋; 带扣; 摄像头支架; 颊垫; 下巴束带; 护罩; 耳垫; 头盔托架; 头盔清洁剂; 镜片; 灯; 内衬; 底座; 护鼻; 衬垫套装; 螺钉套件; 贴纸; 束带; 遮阳板; 防撕膜; 通风口塞; 帽檐; 挡风板; 其他
zh-TW: 安全帽配件類型: 袋子; 扣環; 相機固定座; 臉頰墊; 下巴帶; 護套; 耳墊; 安全帽提袋; 安全帽清潔劑; 鏡片; 燈; 內襯; 固定座; 護鼻; 襯墊組; 螺絲組; 貼紙; 綁帶; 遮陽鏡片; 護目撕膜; 通風孔塞; 面罩; 擋風板; 其他
hu: Sisaktartozék típusa: Táska; Csat; Kameratartó; Arcpárna; Állszíj; Borítás; Fülpárna; Sisaktartó; Sisaktisztító; Lencse; Lámpa; Bélés; Konzol; Orrvédő; Párnakészlet; Csavarkészlet; Matrica; Pánt; Napellenző; Letéphető fólia; Szellőződugó; Plexi/rostély; Szélvédő; Egyéb
sl-SI: Vrsta dodatka za čelado: Torba; Zaponka; Nosilec za kamero; Blazinica za lica; Podbradni trak; Prevleka; Ušesna blazinica; Nosilec za čelado; Čistilo za čelado; Leča; Luč; Podloga; Nosilec; Ščitnik za nos; Komplet blazinic; Komplet vijakov; Nalepka; Trak; Senčnik; Tear-off folija; Čep za zračnik; Vizir; Zaščita pred vetrom; Drugo
nb: Type hjelmtilbehør: Bag; Spenne; Kamerafeste; Kinnpute; Hakestropp; Trekk; Ørepute; Hjelmbærer; Hjelmrens; Linse; Lys; Innerfôr; Feste; Nesebeskyttelse; Polstringssett; Skruesett; Klistremerke; Stropp; Solskjerm; Tear-off-film; Ventilasjonsplugg; Visir; Vindblokker; Annet
ko: 헬멧 액세서리 유형: 가방; 버클; 카메라 마운트; 볼 패드; 턱 스트랩; 커버; 이어 패드; 헬멧 캐리어; 헬멧 클리너; 렌즈; 라이트; 라이너; 마운트; 코 보호대; 패딩 세트; 나사 키트; 스티커; 스트랩; 자외선 차단막; 티어오프 필름; 통풍 플러그; 바이저; 윈드 블로커; 기타
pt-BR: Tipo de acessório de capacete: Bolsa; Fivela; Suporte de câmera; Forração de bochecha; Cinta jugular; Capa; Protetor de orelha; Suporte para capacete; Limpador de capacete; Lente; Luz; Forro; Suporte; Narigueira; Conjunto de acolchoamento; Kit de parafusos; Adesivo; Tira; Viseira solar; Película tear-off; Plugue de ventilação; Viseira; Bavete (corta-vento); Outro
en: Helmet accessory type: Bag; Buckle; Camera mount; Cheek pad; Chin strap; Cover; Ear pad; Helmet carrier; Helmet cleaner; Lens; Light; Liner; Mount; Nose guard; Padding set; Screw kit; Sticker; Strap; Sun shield; Tear-off film; Vent plug; Visor; Wind blocker; Other
sk-SK: Typ príslušenstva prilby: Taška; Pracka; Držiak na kameru; Lícnica; Remienok pod bradu; Poťah; Ušnica; Nosič prilby; Čistič prilby; Sklíčko/šošovka; Svetlo; Výstelka; Držiak; Chránič nosa; Súprava výplní; Súprava skrutiek; Nálepka; Popruh; Slnečná clona; Odtrhávacia fólia; Záslepka vetrania; Priezor; Kryt proti vetru; Iné
de: Art des Helmzubehörs: Tasche; Schnalle; Kamerahalterung; Wangenpolster; Kinnriemen; Bezug; Ohrpolster; Helmträger; Helmreiniger; Linse; Licht; Innenfutter; Halterung; Nasenschutz; Polster-Set; Schrauben-Set; Aufkleber; Gurt; Sonnenvisier; Abreißfolie; Lüftungsverschluss; Visier; Windschutz; Sonstige
pt-PT: Tipo de acessório para capacete: Saco; Fivela; Suporte para câmara; Almofada de bochecha; Fita de queixo; Capa; Almofada de orelha; Suporte de transporte de capacete; Produto de limpeza para capacete; Lente; Luz; Forro; Suporte; Protetor de nariz; Conjunto de acolchoamento; Kit de parafusos; Autocolante; Fita; Viseira de sol; Película tear-off; Tampão de ventilação; Viseira; Bloqueador de vento; Outro
ru: Тип аксессуара шлема: Сумка; Застежка; Крепление для камеры; Подушечка для щек; Ремешок для подбородка; Чехол; Подушечка для ушей; Переноска для шлема; Средство для чистки шлема; Линза; Фонарь; Подкладка; Крепление; Защита носа; Набор подкладок; Набор винтов; Наклейка; Ремешок; Солнцезащитный визор; Отрывная пленка; Заглушка вентиляции; Визор; Ветрозащита; Другое
el: Τύπος αξεσουάρ κράνους: Τσάντα; Αγκράφα; Βάση κάμερας; Μαξιλαράκι στα μάγουλα; Λουράκι σαγονιού; Κάλυμμα; Μαξιλαράκι αυτιών; Θήκη μεταφοράς κράνους; Καθαριστικό κράνους; Φακός; Φως; Επένδυση; Βάση; Προστατευτικό μύτης; Σετ επένδυσης; Κιτ βιδών; Αυτοκόλλητο; Λουράκι; Αντηλιακή ζελατίνα; Μεμβράνη tear-off; Τάπα αεραγωγού; Γείσο; Προστατευτικό ανέμου; Άλλο
fi: Kypärän lisävarusteen tyyppi: Laukku; Solki; Kamerakiinnike; Poskipehmuste; Leukahihna; Suoja; Korvapehmuste; Kypärän kantolaukku; Kypäränpuhdistusaine; Linssi; Valo; Vuori; Kiinnike; Nenäsuoja; Pehmustesetti; Ruuvipakkaus; Tarra; Hihna; Aurinkosuoja; Repäisykalvo; Tuuletusaukon tulppa; Visiiri; Tuulisuoja; Muu
tr: Kask aksesuar tipi: Çanta; Toka; Kamera montaj aparatı; Yanak pedi; Çene kayışı; Kılıf; Kulak pedi; Kask taşıyıcı; Kask temizleyici; Lens; Işık; Astar; Montaj aparatı; Burun koruyucu; Ped seti; Vida kiti; Çıkartma; Kayış; Güneş vizörü; Yırt-at film; Havalandırma tapası; Vizör; Rüzgar engelleyici; Diğer
ja: ヘルメットアクセサリータイプ: バッグ; バックル; カメラマウント; チークパッド; チンストラップ; カバー; イヤーパッド; ヘルメットキャリア; ヘルメットクリーナー; レンズ; ライト; ライナー; マウント; ノーズガード; パッドセット; ネジキット; ステッカー; ストラップ; サンシールド; ティアオフフィルム; ベントプラグ; バイザー; ウィンドブロッカー; その他
it: Tipo di accessorio per casco: Borsa; Fibbia; Supporto per fotocamera; Guanciale; Cinturino sottogola; Copertura; Paraorecchie; Portacaschi; Detergente per caschi; Lente; Luce; Fodera; Supporto; Paranaso; Set di imbottiture; Kit di viti; Adesivo; Cinturino; Parasole; Pellicola a strappo (tear-off); Tappo di ventilazione; Visiera; Paravento; Altro
th: ประเภทอุปกรณ์เสริมหมวกกันน็อค: กระเป๋า; ตัวล็อก; ที่ยึดกล้อง; นวมแก้ม; สายรัดคาง; ที่คลุม; แผ่นรองหู; กระเป๋าใส่หมวกกันน็อก; น้ำยาทำความสะอาดหมวกกันน็อก; เลนส์; ไฟ; ซับใน; ที่ยึด; การ์ดจมูก; ชุดแผ่นรอง; ชุดสกรู; สติกเกอร์; สายรัด; ที่บังแดด; ฟิล์มฉีก; ปลั๊กช่องระบายอากาศ; กระบังหน้า; แผ่นกั้นลม; อื่นๆ
pl: Typ akcesorium do kasku: Torba; Klamra; Uchwyt na kamerę; Poduszka policzkowa; Pasek podbródkowy; Pokrowiec; Nausznik; Nosidło na kask; Środek do czyszczenia kasku; Szybka; Lampka; Wyściółka; Uchwyt/mocowanie; Osłona nosa; Zestaw wkładek; Zestaw śrub; Naklejka; Pasek; Blenda przeciwsłoneczna; Zrywka; Zaślepka wentylacyjna; Wizjer; Deflektor wiatru; Inny
da: Tilbehørstype for hjelm: Taske; Spænde; Kamerabeslag; Kindpude; Hagerem; Cover; Ørepude; Hjelmbærer; Hjelmrens; Linse; Lys; For; Beslag; Næsebeskytter; Polstringssæt; Skruesæt; Klistermærke; Rem; Solskærm; Tear-off-film; Ventilationsprop; Visir; Vindblokering; Andet
lt-LT: Šalmų priedo tipas: Krepšys; Sagtis; Kameros laikiklis; Skruostų pagalvėlė; Smakro dirželis; Uždangalas; Ausų pagalvėlė; Šalmo dėklas; Šalmo valiklis; Lęšis; Žibintas; Pamušalas; Laikiklis; Nosies apsauga; Pagalvėlių rinkinys; Varžtų rinkinys; Lipdukas; Dirželis; Skydelis nuo saulės; Nuplėšiama plėvelė; Ventiliacijos kaištis; Skydelis; Apsauga nuo vėjo; Kita
fr: Type d'accessoire pour casque: Sac; Boucle; Support de caméra; Coussinet de joue; Mentonnière; Housse; Coussinet d’oreille; Porte-casque; Nettoyant pour casque; Écran; Lumière; Doublure; Support; Protège-nez; Ensemble de rembourrage; Kit de vis; Autocollant; Sangle; Pare-soleil; Film tear-off; Bouchon d’aération; Visière; Bloque-vent; Autre
cs: Typ příslušenství k přilbě: Taška; Spona; Držák na kameru; Lícnice; Podbradní pásek; Obal; Náušník; Nosič helmy; Čistič helem; Zorník; Světlo; Vložka; Držák; Ochrana nosu; Sada výstelek; Sada šroubů; Nálepka; Popruh; Sluneční clona; Ochranná fólie (strhávací); Záslepka ventilace; Hledí; Chránič proti větru; Jiné
vi: Loại phụ kiện mũ bảo hiểm: Túi; Khóa cài; Giá gắn máy ảnh; Đệm má; Dây đeo cằm; Vỏ bọc; Đệm tai; Giá đỡ mũ bảo hiểm; Chất làm sạch mũ bảo hiểm; Tròng kính; Đèn; Lớp lót; Ngàm gắn; Miếng bảo vệ mũi; Bộ đệm; Bộ ốc vít; Nhãn dán; Dây đeo; Tấm che nắng; Màng xé; Nút bịt lỗ thông hơi; Kính che mặt; Tấm chắn gió; Khác
sv: Typ av hjälmtillbehör: Väska; Spänne; Kamerafäste; Kindkudde; Hakrem; Överdrag; Öronkudde; Hjälmbärare; Hjälmrengöring; Lins; Lampa; Foder; Fäste; Nässkydd; Vadderingsset; Skruvkit; Klistermärke; Rem; Solskydd; Tear-off-film; Ventilplugg; Visir; Vindskydd; Övrigt
hr-HR: Vrsta dodatka za kacigu: Torba; Kopča; Nosač za kameru; Jastučić za obraze; Remen za bradu; Navlaka; Jastučić za uho; Nosač za kacigu; Sredstvo za čišćenje kacige; Leća; Svjetlo; Podstava; Nosač; Štitnik za nos; Komplet jastučića; Komplet vijaka; Naljepnica; Remen; Štitnik za sunce; Tear-off folija; Čep za ventilaciju; Vizir; Štitnik za vjetar; Ostalo
bg-BG: Тип аксесоар за каска: Чанта; Катарама; Стойка за камера; Подложка за бузи; Каишка за брадичката; Калъф; Подложка за уши; Носач за каска; Почистващ препарат за каски; Плака; Светлина; Подплата; Стойка; Протектор за нос; Комплект подплънки; Комплект винтове; Стикер; Каишка; Слънцезащитен визьор; Фолио за отлепване; Тапа за вентилация; Визьор; Протектор срещу вятър; Други
ro-RO: Tipul de accesoriu pentru cască: Geantă; Cataramă; Suport pentru cameră; Burete pentru obraji; Curea pentru bărbie; Husă; Burete pentru urechi; Suport de transport pentru cască; Soluție de curățat casca; Lentilă; Lumină; Căptușeală; Suport; Protecție pentru nas; Set de protecții; Set de șuruburi; Autocolant; Curea; Parasolar; Folie tip tear-off; Dop de ventilație; Vizieră; Protecție împotriva vântului; Altele
nl: Type helmaccessoire: Tas; Gesp; Camerahouder; Wangkussen; Kinband; Hoes; Oorkussen; Helmdrager; Helmreiniger; Lens; Licht; Voering; Houder; Neusbeschermer; Padding-set; Schroevenset; Sticker; Band; Zonnescherm; Tear-off folie; Ventilatieplug; Vizier; Windblokkering; Overig